Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
CHAPTER 5 Wild Animals

Cross references.

Property rights in animals, §

44-1-8

.

Ownership of deposit and offspring by wild animals on land, §

44-1-9

.

27-5-1.
Legislative intent and findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the public interest to ensure the public health, safety, and welfare by strictly regulating in this state the importation, transportation, sale, transfer, and possession of those wild animals which pose a possibility of:

Harmful competition for wildlife;

The introduction of a disease or pest harmful to wildlife;

Problems of enforcing laws and regulations relative to wildlife;

Threatening wildlife or other natural resources; or

Endangering the physical safety of human beings.

The importation, transportation, sale, transfer, and possession of wild animals are privileges not to be granted unless it can be clearly demonstrated that such actions can be accomplished in a manner that does not pose unnecessary risk to Georgia’s wildlife and other natural resources or to the citizens of and visitors to this state. For these reasons, the General Assembly further finds and declares that only certain wild animals may be held for scientific or educational purposes, for public exhibition, or as pets and may only be lawfully held when the requirements of this chapter are met. The General Assembly further finds and declares that any wild animal for which a license or permit, or both, is required under the provisions of this chapter and for which no such license or permit, or both, has been obtained is a nuisance and is contraband and is subject to seizure by any peace officer authorized to enforce this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-1101, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27.

Cross references.

Liability of owner or keeper of vicious or dangerous animal for injuries caused by animal, § 51-2-7.

27-5-2.
Powers of board generally.

The board shall have the authority to regulate the importation, transportation, sale, and possession of wild animals when and to the extent that the importation, transportation, sale, or possession poses a possibility of:

Harmful competition for wildlife;

The introduction of a disease or pest harmful to wildlife;

Problems of enforcement of laws and regulations relating to wildlife;

Danger to wildlife or other natural resources; or

Danger to the physical safety of human beings.

The board is specifically authorized to supplement the list of wild animals set forth in this chapter for which a permit or license, or both, is required.

The board shall have the authority to require that any listed wild animal that is imported, transported, possessed, sold, or transferred by any person, including wild animal dealers, be labeled with the correct species, number, age, or other relevant information.

The board shall have the authority to require an applicant for a permit or license required under this chapter to supply such information and to supply it in such form as the board deems necessary for the department to discharge its responsibilities under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1254, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-1107, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, §§ 17, 18.

27-5-2.1.
Definitions; importation restrictions; prohibition on possession of cervid carcasses.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Cervid” means a member of the family cervidae.

“Chronic wasting disease” means a fatal disease that belongs to a group of diseases known as transmissible spongiform encephalopathies and that affects the brains of cervids.

“Importation” means the transportation of a cervid, cervid carcass, or carcass part into this state.

“Whole” means the entire carcass, whether eviscerated or not, prior to the carcass being processed.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or association to import, bring, or cause to be imported or brought into this state any live cervid, except as otherwise authorized by rule or regulation of the board in effect as of January 1, 2007, or such later date as may be provided by Code Section 27-1-39.

Any person who violates paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500.00 nor more than $5,000.00, imprisonment for a period not exceeding 12 months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

The hunting and fishing privileges of any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be suspended for not less than three years from the date of conviction.

It shall be unlawful for any person to import or possess a whole cervid carcass or cervid carcass part from any place outside of Georgia, except for any one or more of the following cervid carcass parts:

Boned-out meat or products thereof;

Antlers, skulls, skull plates, teeth, or jawbones with no soft tissue attached;

Hides with no heads attached; and

Finished taxidermy mounts.

Upon the detection of chronic wasting disease in this state or any county adjacent to the borders of this state, the department shall have the authority to restrict the movement or transport of cervid carcasses, or carcass parts within this state. A violation of any such restriction shall be treated as a violation of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-5-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 226, § 4/HB 338; Ga. L. 2022, p. 747, § 1/HB 1148.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted former paragraph (a)(3), which read: “‘Clean’ means having no meat matter or tissue attached to the carcass part.”, redesignated former paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5) as present paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4), respectively; rewrote subsection (c) and added subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, a colon was substituted for a comma at the end of the introductory language of subsection (a).

27-5-3.
Powers of department generally.

The department shall have the authority to prescribe the form and contents for the license and permit applications provided for in this chapter.

The department shall issue or deny all permits and licenses required by this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

The department may, prior to a hearing, issue a cease and desist order or other appropriate order to any person who is violating this chapter or any regulation, permit, or license issued pursuant to this chapter.

The department may quarantine or otherwise dispose of or order the disposition of any wild animal when it determines that the wild animal is affected with or exposed to a contagious or infectious disease or is infested with a parasite or pest harmful to wildlife.

The department shall have the authority, based upon the standards set forth in Code Section 27-5-6, to determine if the necessary facilities, conditions, and standards prescribed by this chapter are sufficient for safety to the public and for the humane handling, care, confinement, and transportation of the wild animal for which application for a permit or license, or both, has been received. The department shall be authorized to make such determinations by inspecting the facilities of the permit or license holder. Following such determination, the department also has the authority to condition the license or permit so that the standards and intent of this chapter are met.

The department is authorized to capture and contain any wild animal regulated by this chapter which has escaped or been released when such wild animal is determined by the department to pose a risk to Georgia’s wildlife or other natural resources or to the citizens of and visitors to this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1254, § 5; Code 1933, § 45-1106, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, § 16.

27-5-4.
Wild animal licenses and permits generally.

Unless otherwise provided in Code Section 27-5-5, it shall be unlawful for any person to import, transport, transfer, sell, purchase, or possess any wild animal listed in Code Section 27-5-5 or specified by the board by regulation without first obtaining a wild animal license from the department as provided in Code Section 27-2-23 or a wild animal permit as provided in this Code section; provided, however, anyone holding a deer-farming license is not required to have a wild animal license or permit to possess farmed deer. Unless otherwise specified by the department, such license or permit shall be effective from April 1 through March 31 and may contain such conditions and restrictions, including restrictions as to numbers and species of animals, as the department determines appropriate in light of the provisions of this chapter. An applicant for a wild animal license or permit shall have the burden of proving that any wild animals subject to such license or permit are or will be imported, transported, transferred, sold, purchased, or possessed in compliance with this chapter.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, wild animal licenses will be issued only to persons engaged in the wholesale or retail wild animal business or persons exhibiting wild animals to the public. Wild animal permits will be issued at no cost and only to persons for scientific or educational purposes, to persons with a permanent disability or disease as provided and for the purpose described in paragraph (2) of this subsection, or to a pond owner for grass carp or grass carp hybrids where the department has determined that the possession of such carp by the pond owner will not constitute a threat to wildlife; provided, however, that no such permit shall be required for persons buying triploid grass carp from properly licensed wild animal dealers authorized to sell grass carp where the bill of sale is retained by the buyer as proof of such sale and where the triploid grass carp are to be stocked only into a private pond; provided, further, that no such license or permit shall be required solely for the transportation of wild animals through this state where the animals remain in this state no more than 24 hours and are not sold or transferred while in this state.

The department shall issue a wild animal permit only for an animal in the genus Cebus (capuchin monkeys) to any person who establishes to the satisfaction of the department that:

Such person has a permanent disability or disease which interferes with the person’s ability to perform one or more routine daily living activities;

The animal for which the permit is to be issued has been trained to assist the person in performing his or her daily living activities;

The animal will be humanely treated and will not present a health or safety threat;

The animal for which the permit is to be issued is the only wild animal to be possessed by that person;

The permittee does not have a history of violating this chapter; and

The organization furnishing the animal to the applicant:

Is reputable, lawful, and does not have any history of violating this chapter;

Provides to the department documentation and data sufficient to establish that the organization has a proven record, over at least a ten-year period, of furnishing animals which provide meaningful assistance to persons with disabilities; and

Has received and maintained a nonprofit, tax-exempt status.

Permits issued under the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be issued only to individuals and are nontransferable.

Capuchin monkeys possessed under the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection are exempt from the requirements of paragraph (5) of subsection (k) of this Code section but must be treated humanely and shall be kept only in the residence of the permittee. When transported, the monkey must be in a USDA approved carrier and there shall be no contact allowed between the public and monkey when outside the permittee’s residence. Under no circumstances may the monkey be present on premises where food is sold.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, transfer, deliver, or surrender a wild animal listed in Code Section 27-5-5 or specified by the board by regulation to any other person unless that other person holds a license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter for such wild animal or is exempt from the requirement for such a permit or license by the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section.

No wild animal license or permit shall be required for a carrier regulated either by the Interstate Commerce Commission, the Civil Aeronautics Board, or the Department of Public Safety to import or transport any wild animal.

Any licenses issued by the department to any person for public exhibition purposes shall be conditioned so that the person operating a wild animal exhibition in a nontraveling, fixed facility shall make the facility open to the public for a time no less than 30 hours per week for at least six months each year; and the person operating a wild animal exhibition in a transient facility shall make the facility open to the public for a reasonable period of time and for reasonable hours of the day, depending upon the nature of the exhibition. The department is authorized to issue such licenses in accordance with this chapter requiring adequate facilities for the humane handling, care, and confinement of wild animals and ensuring public safety. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, exhibitions of wild animals by federal, state, city, county, or municipal governments or their agencies and transient circuses, which circuses can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that 10 percent of the proceeds from such exhibitions shall be devoted to charitable purposes in this state, shall not be required to purchase a wild animal license but shall be required to obtain the license, at no charge, from the department; provided, however, all other provisions of this chapter and all regulations relating to the humane handling, care, and confinement of wild animals must be complied with.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a wild animal license or permit is required for the possession of any wild animal listed in subsection (b) of Code Section 27-5-5 or as required by regulation of the board. Liability insurance is required for the possession of any wild animal that is classified as being inherently dangerous to people in subsection (a) of Code Section 27-5-5 or as required by regulation of the board. Prior to the issuance of a wild animal license or permit for animals classified as being inherently dangerous to people, any applicant other than a governmental agency or university research facility must provide proof of liability insurance from a company licensed to do business in this state or an unauthorized insurer if permitted by Chapter 5 of Title 33. Such insurance must be maintained in force and effect and cover claims for injury or damage to persons or property in an amount equal to $40,000.00 for each inherently dangerous animal up to a maximum of $500,000.00. The insurance company shall notify the department at least 30 days prior to the termination of the policy by the company. Liability insurance is not required for wild animals that are not considered to be inherently dangerous to people.

Any license or permit issued in accordance with this chapter shall be valid only for the species and numbers of wild animals referenced on the application and the license or permit. The license or permit to hold a female wild animal shall cover her progeny only while the progeny are physically dependent upon her or until her progeny are two months of age, whichever period is longer. It shall also be unlawful to transfer any license or permit issued by the department from one person to another person.

It shall be unlawful for any person holding a license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter to import, transport, sell, transfer, or possess any wild animal in facilities not approved by the department as described in Code Section 27-5-6.

In the event that a determination has been made to revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter, the applicant for the license or permit may appeal the determination according to the provisions stated in Code Section 27-2-25.

It shall be unlawful for any person holding a license or permit pursuant to this chapter to import, purchase, transport, sell, or transfer any wild animal and fail to record in a record book, within 24 hours after the completion of such a transaction, the date, place, manner, and names and addresses of all persons involved in such a transaction. It shall also be unlawful to fail to maintain such records for a period of 12 months or to fail to provide the department access to such records during all regular business hours.

Wild animal licenses shall not be issued unless the following conditions are met:

The applicant must be at least 18 years of age;

Applicants requesting a license for mammals must obtain a license from the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture or provide written documentation that the applicant is exempt from such requirements;

Applicants must submit documentation verifying that the proposed construction of facilities and the holding of wild animals is not prohibited by county or municipal ordinances;

The applicant must obtain required business licenses; and

Facilities for holding or exhibiting wild animals must be completely separated from a residence and meet specifications for humane handling, care, and confinement as provided in Code Section 27-5-6.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1254, § 3; Code 1933, § 45-1101, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 64-66; Code 1933, § 45-1101.1, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, § 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, §§ 5-9; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 17; Ga. L. 1985, p. 913, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 842, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 14; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1157, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1742, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1395, § 4; Ga. L. 2006, p. 138, § 2/HB 695; Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 5/HB 865.

Cross references.

Property rights in animals, §

44-1-8

.

Ownership of deposits by and offspring of wild animals on land, §

44-1-9

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “ensuring” was substituted for “insuring” in the second sentence of subsection (e).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the word “insurer” was substituted for “insuror” in the first (now third) sentence of subsection (f).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “this Code section” was substituted for “Code Section 27-5-4” in the first sentence of paragraph (b)(4).

27-5-5.
Wild animals for which license or permit required.

The following animals are considered to be inherently dangerous to human beings and are subject to the license or permit and insurance requirements provided for in subsection (f) of Code Section 27-5-4:

Class Mammalia:

Order Marsupialia: Genus Macropus (Kangaroos, wallabies, wallaroos) — All species;

Order Primates:

Family Pongidae (gibbons, orang-utan, chimpanzees, siamangs, and gorillas) — All species;

Family Cercopithecidae:

Genus Macaca (macaques) — All species;

Genus Papio (mandrills, drills, and baboons) — All species;

Theropithecus gelada (Gelada baboon);

Order Carnivora:

Family Canidae:

Genus Canis (wolves, jackals, and dingos); all species; except that any person possessing hybrid crosses between wolves and domestic animals on July 1, 1994, shall have until July 1, 1995, to apply for a fee-exempt permit to possess these animals as pets; provided, however, that the said hybrid is sexually neutered; provided, further, that it shall be unlawful to transfer possession or ownership of said hybrid without prior written approval from the department. Liability insurance shall not be mandatory for wolf hybrids possessed under this fee-exempt permit;

Chrysocyon brachyurus (maned wolf);

Cuon alpinus (red dog);

Lycaon pictus (African hunting dog);

Family Ursidae (bears) — All species;

Family Mustelidae — Gulo gulo (wolverine);

Family Hyaenidae (hyenas) — All species;

Family Felidae:

Genus Leo or Panthera or Neofelis (lions, tigers, jaguars, and leopards) — All species;

Unica unica (snow leopard);

Acinonyx jubatus (cheetah);

Felis concolor (cougar) — All subspecies;

Order Proboscidae: Family Elephantidae (elephants) — All species;

Order Perissodactyla: Family Rhinocerotidae (rhinoceroses) — All species;

Order Artiodactyla:

Family Suidae — Phacochoerus aethiopicus (wart hog);

Family Hippopotamidae — Hippopotamus amphibius (hippopotamus);

Family Bovidae:

Genus Taurotragus (elands) — All species;

Boselaphus tragocamelus (nilgais);

Bos sauveli (kouprey);

Syncerus caffer (African buffalo);

Hippotragus niger (sable);

Oryx gazella (gemsbok);

Addax nasomaculatus (addax);

Genus Alcelaphus (hartebeests) — All species;

Genus Connochaetes (gnu, wildebeest) — All species;

Class Reptilia:

Order Crocodylia:

Family Crocodylidae (crocodiles, gavials, etc.) — All species;

Family Alligatoridae — (alligators and caimans) — All species;

Order Squamata:

Suborder Serpentes:

Family Elapidae (cobras, coral snakes, etc.) — All species;

Family Viperidae (adders, vipers, etc.) — All species;

Family Colubridae — All poisonous rear-fanged species (Opisthoglypis);

Family Crotalidae (pit vipers) — All species;

Suborder Lacertilia: Family Helodermatidae (Gila monsters and beaded lizards) — All species;

Class Osteichthyes:

Order Cypriniformes (Suborder Characoidei): Family Characidae (tetra, piranha): Genera Serrasalmus, Serrasalmo, Pygocentrus, Taddyella, Rooseveltiella, Pygopristis (piranhas) — All species;

Order Siluriformes: Family Trichomycteridae (parasitic catfishes): Genera Vandellia (candiru) and Urinophilus — All species; and

Class Chondrichthyes (cartilaginous fish): Order Rajiformes: Family Potamotrygonidae (fresh-water stingray) — All species.

Except as provided in this Code section, a license or permit is required for the following wild animals and any others specified by regulation of the board:

Class Mammalia:

Order Marsupialia — All species other than those listed in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of this Code section; except that Petaurus breviceps (sugar glider) may be sold, purchased, exhibited, or held as a pet without a license or permit if the owner thereof possesses valid documentation that the animal originated from a source inspected and regulated by the United States Department of Agriculture;

Order Insectivora (shrews, moles, etc.) — All species;

Order Dermoptera (flying lemurs) — All species;

Order Chiroptera (bats) — All species;

Order Primates (monkeys, apes, etc.) — All species except Family Hominidae;

Order Edentata (sloths, armadillos, etc.) — All species;

Order Pholidota (pangolins or scaly anteaters) — All species;

Order Lagomorpha (rabbits, hares, etc.) — All species except Genus Oryctolagus; or any other normally domesticated species;

Order Rodentia (rats, mice, etc.) — All species except Genus Cavia; Genus Gerbillus; Genus Mesocricetus; Mus musculous; Rattus rattus; Rattus norvegicus; or any other normally domesticated species;

Order Cetacea (whales, dolphins, etc.) — All species;

Order Carnivora (weasels, ferrets, cats, bears, wolves, etc.) — All species, except that a European ferret (Mustela putorius furo) may be sold, purchased, exhibited, or held as a pet without a license or permit; provided, however, that the ferret owner can provide valid documentation that the ferret was sexually neutered prior to seven months of age and is vaccinated against rabies with a properly administered vaccine approved for use on ferrets by the United States Department of Agriculture;

Order Tubulidentata (aardvark) — All species;

Order Proboscidea (elephants) — All species;

Order Hyracoidea (conies) — All species;

Order Sirenia (manatees, dugong) — All species;

Order Perissodactyla (odd-toed ungulates) — All species;

Order Artiodactyla (even-toed ungulates) — All species except Bison bison (buffalo), Bubalus bubalis (water buffalo), and Llama guanicoe, L. glama, and L. pacos (llamas);

Class Aves:

Order Falconiformes (hawks, eagles, vultures, etc.) — All species except that persons possessing a federal falconry license shall be allowed to possess birds in the Order Falconiformes without obtaining a wild animal license;

Order Galliformes: Family Meleagrididae (turkeys) — All species not normally domesticated;

Order Psittaciformes: Myiopsitta monachus (monk parakeet);

Order Cuculiformes: Family Cuculidae (cuckoos) — All species;

Order Strigiformes (owls) — All species;

Order Passeriformes:

Family Alaudidae (larks): Alauda arvensis (sky larks);

Family Pycnonotidae (bulbuls) — All species;

Family Muscicapidae (thrushes, blackbirds, fieldfare, etc.): Genus Turdus — All species;

Family Zosteropidae (white eyes): Genus Zosterops — All species;

Family Emberizidae (buntings, etc.): Emberiza citrinella (yellow hammer);

Family Ploceidae (sparrows, weavers, queleas, weaver finches, etc.):

Genus Passer — All species except Passer domesticus (English house sparrow);

Ploceus capensis (cape weaver);

Ploceus philippinus (Baya weaver);

Genus Quelea — All species;

Family Icteridae (blackbirds, grackles, orioles, etc.): Genera Molothrus, Quiscalus, and Agelaius — All species;

Family Estrildidae (waxbills, ricebirds, munias, weaver finches, etc.): Padda oryzivora (Java sparrow);

Family Sturnidae (starlings, mynas, etc.) — All species except Sturnus vulgaris (starling) and Gracula religiosa (Hill mynas);

Family Corvidae (crows, ravens, etc.) — All species;

Class Amphibia (Order Anura):

Family Bufonidae (toads): Bufo marinus, Bufo paracnemis, Bufo horribilis (giant or marine toad group);

Class Osteichthyes (bony fish):

Order Cypriniformes (Suborder Characoidei): Family Characidae (tetra, piranha):

Astyanax faciatus (banded tetra);

Genera Serrasalmus, Serrasalmo, Pygocentrus, Taddyella, Rooseveltiella, Pygopristis (piranhas) — All species;

Order Cypriniformes (Suborder Cyprinoidei): Family Cyprinidae (carp, grass carp, orfe, etc.):

Ctenopharyngodon idella (grass carp);

Hypophthalmichthys molitrix (silver carp);

Aristichthys nobilis (bighead carp);

Order Siluriformes:

Family Clariidae (air-breathing catfishes) — All species;

Family Trichomycteridae (parasitic catfishes): Genera Vandellia (candiru) and Urinophilus — All species;

Family Heteropneustidae (giant walking catfishes): Genus Heteropneustes — All species;

Order Perciformes (Suborder Channoidei) Family Channidae (snakeheads): Genera Ophicephalus and Channa — All species;

Class Chondrichthyes (cartilaginous fish): Order Rajiformes: Family Potamotrygonidae (fresh-water stingray) — All species; and

All exotic fish which are not held in aquaria or tanks, provided that, as used in this Code section, “aquaria or tanks” means containers for holding fish from which no water is discharged, except during periodic cleaning, and which discharged water is passed through a filtering system capable of removing all fish and fish eggs and is disposed of only in a septic tank permitted by the county or in a waste-water treatment system permitted by the Environmental Protection Division of the department. For purposes of this paragraph, exotic fish are all fish species not native to Georgia. This paragraph shall not apply to any species of fish regulated by any other chapter of this title.

Any person who on July 1, 1994, possessed a wild animal for which a license or permit was not required prior to July 1, 1994, shall have until January 1, 1995, to apply for a fee-exempt permit, provided that the requirements of this chapter relating to insurance and humane handling, care, and confinement of wild animals are met. Such permits shall only be valid for wild animals possessed prior to July 1, 1994, and shall not authorize breeding, importation, sale, or transfer without specific authorization from the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-1102, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 67, 68; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, §§ 10-12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 913, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1157, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1636, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1742, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 19; Ga. L. 2008, p. 702, §§ 2, 3/HB 239.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a colon was substituted for a period at the end of the introductory language and “Suborder” was substituted for “Sub-order” in subparagraph (2)(B)(a) (now subparagraph (a)(3)(A).